Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 9 of Title 74, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
No person, without regard to whether that person is a United
States national, may file and run for or hold any elected municipal,
county, state, or other government office in the State of Oklahoma
if that person is a national of any country other than the United
States.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16019 MJ 01/29/26
Req. No. 16019 Page 1